Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB351.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 511 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of smash and grab burglary when, with the intent to commit a
theft, he or she intentionally enters a retail establishment and causes damage in
excess of five hundred dollars ($500) to the establishment without the owner's
consent.
(2) Smash and grab burglary is a Class B felony, unless the person uses a motor
vehicle to cause damage to the retail establishment, in which case it is a Class A
felony.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/17/2025 4:22 PM Jacketed